Washington statutes.
RCW 36.120.110

Governing board—Powers and duties—Intent.

(1) The governing board of the district is responsible for the execution of the voter-approved plan. The board shall:

(a) Impose taxes and fees authorized by district voters;

(b) Enter into agreements with state, local, and regional agencies and departments as necessary to accomplish district purposes and protect the district's investment in transportation projects;

(c) Accept gifts, grants, or other contributions of funds that will support the purposes and programs of the district;

(d) Monitor and audit the progress and execution of transportation projects to protect the investment of the public and annually make public its findings;

(e) Pay for services and enter into leases and contracts, including professional service contracts;

(f) Hire no more than ten employees, including a director or executive officer, a treasurer or financial officer, a project manager or engineer, a project permit coordinator, and clerical staff; and

(g) Coordinate its activities with affected cities, towns, and other local governments, including any regional transit authority existing either partially or entirely within the district area, that engage in transportation planning; and

(h) Exercise other powers and duties as may be reasonable to carry out the purposes of the district.

(2) It is the intent of the legislature that existing staff resources of lead agencies be used in implementing this chapter. A district may coordinate its activities with the department, which shall provide services, data, and personnel to assist as desired by the regional transportation investment district. Lead agencies for transportation projects that are not state facilities shall also provide staff support for the board.

(3) A district may not acquire, hold, or dispose of real property.

(4) Except for the limited purposes provided under RCW 36.120.020(8), a district may not own, operate, or maintain an ongoing facility, road, or transportation system.

(5) A district may accept and expend or use gifts, grants, or donations.

(6) It is the intent of the legislature that administrative and overhead costs of a regional transportation investment district be minimized. For transportation projects costing up to fifty million dollars, administrative and overhead costs may not exceed three percent of the total construction and design project costs per year. For transportation projects costing more than fifty million dollars, administrative and overhead costs may not exceed three percent of the first fifty million dollars in costs, plus an additional one-tenth of one percent of each additional dollar above fifty million. These limitations apply only to the district, and do not limit the administration or expenditures of the department.

(7) A district may use the design-build procedure for transportation projects developed by it. As used in this section "design-build procedure" means a method of contracting under which the district contracts with another party for that party to both design and build the structures, facilities, and other items specified in the contract. The requirements and limitations of RCW 47.20.780 and 47.20.785 do not apply to the transportation projects under this chapter.

[ 2006 c 311 s 11; 2002 c 56 s 111.]

NOTES:

Findings—2006 c 311: See note following RCW 36.120.020.